District of Columbia statutes.
38-1204.01

Meetings of Trustees.

(a)

(1)

The chairperson or a majority of the members of the Trustees may convene a meeting. The Trustees shall hold meetings periodically, as scheduled by the Trustees; provided, that at least 4 meetings shall be held each year. All meetings shall be held in the District of Columbia. Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, meetings shall be noticed to the public and open to the public.

(2)

The Trustees may convene in executive session by a vote of a majority of the voting members serving to take action on matters that:

(A)

Relate to personnel or to practices of the Trustees;

(B)

Would result in the disclosure of matters specifically exempted from disclosure by statute; or

(C)

Would result in the disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.

(3)

The Trustees shall keep the minutes of each meeting of the Trustees and shall make the minutes of each public meeting available to the public for inspection and distribution.

(b)

No official action may be taken at a meeting or an executive session unless a quorum is present; except, that a lesser number may hold a hearing. A majority of the voting members serving on the Board of Trustees shall constitute a quorum.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1429, Pub. L. 93-471, title IV, § 401
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 5, 22 DCR 2931
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-132, § 2, 25 DCR 3489
Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-286, § 2(c), 57 DCR 11012
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-251, § 2, 60 DCR 980
1981 Ed., § 31-1531.
1973 Ed., § 31-1731.
D.C. Law 18-286 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“Meetings may be called by the Chairperson or a majority of the members of the Trustees. No official action may be taken by the Trustees except at a meeting of the Trustees at which a quorum is present. A total of 8 of the voting members of the Board of Trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, except a lesser number may hold hearings. Each meeting of the Trustees shall be open to the public and held in the District of Columbia with appropriate notice of each such meeting given to the general public, except a majority of the Trustees may elect to go into executive session to take action on personnel matters. The Trustees shall meet at stated times established by the Board of Trustees, but not less frequently than 4 times a year.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-251 substituted “4 meetings” for “6 meetings” in (a)(1).
Section 2(b) of D.C. Laws 13-095, in the third sentence, substituted “A majority” for “A total of 8”.
Section 6(b) of D.C. Laws 13-095 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-91 substituted “A majority of the voting members of the Board of Trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business” for “A total of 8 of the voting members of the Board of Trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-91 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 18-282 amended the section to read as follows:
“Sec. 401. Meetings of Trustees.
“(a)(1) The chairperson or a majority of the members of the Trustees may convene a meeting. The Trustees shall hold meetings periodically, as scheduled by the Trustees; provided, that at least 6 meetings shall be held each year. All meetings shall be held in the District of Columbia. Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, meetings shall be noticed to the public and open to the public.
“(2) The Trustees may convene in executive session by a vote of a majority of the voting members serving to take action on matters that:
“(A) Relate to personnel or to practices of the Trustees;
“(B) Would result in the disclosure of matters specifically exempted from disclosure by statute; or
“(C) Would result in the disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.
“(3) The Board shall keep the minutes of each meeting of the Board and shall make the minutes of each public meeting available to the public for inspection and distribution.
“(b) No official action may be taken at a meeting or an executive session unless a quorum is present; except, that a lesser number may hold a hearing. A majority of the voting members serving on the Board of Trustees shall constitute a quorum.”.
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 18-282 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-210, December 17, 1999, 47 DCR 9).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-280, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2022).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia Board Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-372, June 26, 2000, 47 DCR 5844).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of University of the District of Columbia Board of Trustees Quorum Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-199, October 10, 2009, 56 DCR 8135).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of University of the District of Columbia Board of Trustees Quorum Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-459, July 7, 2010, 57 DCR 6056).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of University of the District of Columbia Board of Trustees Quorum and Contracting Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-542, October 9, 2010, 57 DCR 9627).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of University of the District of Columbia Board of Trustees Quorum and Contracting Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-661, December 30, 2010, 58 DCR 70).